Illinois, session 104th, HB5555.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/1-1)7    Sec. 1-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Property Tax Code.9(Source: P.A. 88-455.)